Idaho, session 2025, H0078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-105. DEFINITIONS -- D. (1) "Dealer" means every person in the busi-
ness of buying, selling or exchanging five (5) or more new or used vehicles,
new or used neighborhood electric vehicles, new or used motorcycles, motor-
driven cycles, snow machines or motorbikes, travel trailers, truck campers,
all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles or motor homes in any calendar
year, either outright or on conditional sale, bailment, lease, chattel mort-
gage, or otherwise, or who has an established place of business for the sale,
lease, trade, or display of these vehicles. No insurance company, bank, fi-
nance company, public utilities company, or other person coming into posses-
sion of any vehicle, as an incident to its regular business, who shall sell
that vehicle under any contractual rights it may have, shall be considered a
dealer. See also "salvage pool," section 49-120, Idaho Code.
(2) "Dealer's selling agreement." (See "Franchise," section 49-107,
Idaho Code)
(3) "Department" means the Idaho transportation department acting di-
rectly or through its duly authorized officers and agents, except in chap-
ters 6 and 9, title 49, Idaho Code, where the term means the Idaho state po-
lice, except as otherwise specifically provided.
(4) "Designated family member" means the spouse, child, grandchild,
parent, brother or sister of the owner of a vehicle dealership who, in the
event of the owner's death, is entitled to inherit the ownership interest in
the dealership under the same terms of the owner's will, or who has been nom-
inated in any other written instrument, or who, in the case of an incapaci-
tated owner of a dealership, has been appointed by a court as the legal repre-
sentative of the dealer's property.


(5) "Director" means the director of the Idaho transportation depart-
ment, except in chapters 6, 9 and 22, title 49, Idaho Code, where the term
means the director of the Idaho state police.
(6) "Disclose" means to engage in any practice or conduct to make avail-
able and make known personal information contained in records of the depart-
ment about a person to any other person, organization or entity, by any means
of communication.
(7) "Disqualification" as defined in 49 CFR part 383, means withdrawal
by the department of commercial vehicle driving privileges.
(8) "Distributor" means any person, firm, association, corporation or
trust, resident or nonresident, who has a franchise from a manufacturer of
vehicles to distribute vehicles in this state, and who in whole or in part
sells or distributes new vehicles to dealers or who maintains distributor
representatives.
(9) "Distributor branch" means a branch office similarly maintained by
a distributor for the same purposes a factory branch is maintained.
(10) "Distributor representative" means any person, firm, association,
corporation or trust, and each officer and employee thereof engaged as a rep-
resentative of a distributor or distributor branch of vehicles for the pur-
pose of making or promoting the sale of vehicles, or for supervising or con-
tacting dealers or prospective dealers.
(11) "District" means:
(a) Business district. The territory contiguous to and including a
highway when within any six hundred (600) feet along the highway there
are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including ho-
tels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations and public buildings
which occupy at least three hundred (300) feet of frontage on one side or
three hundred (300) feet collectively on both sides of the highway.
(b) Residential district. The territory contiguous to and including
a highway not comprising a business district when the property on the
highway for a distance of three hundred (300) feet or more is in the main
improved with residences, or residences and buildings in use for busi-
ness.
(c) Urban district. The territory contiguous to and including any
highway which is built up with structures devoted to business, indus-
try or dwelling houses. For purposes of establishing speed limits in
accordance with the provisions of section 49-654, Idaho Code, no state
highway or any portion thereof lying within the boundaries of an urban
district is subject to the limitations which otherwise apply to non-
state highways within an urban district.
(12) "Documented vessel" means a vessel having a valid marine document
as a vessel of the United States.
(13) "Downgrade" as it pertains to commercial drivers licensing shall
mean either:
(a) The driver has changed his or her medical requirement self-certifi-
cation to interstate but operates exclusively in transportation or op-
erations excepted from part 391 of the federal motor carrier safety reg-
ulations; or


(b) The driver has changed his or her medical requirement self-certifi-
cation to intrastate and operates exclusively in transportation or op-
erations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code; or
(c) The driver no longer has commercial motor vehicle driving privi-
leges, but has retained privileges to drive noncommercial motor vehi-
cles.
(14) "Drag race" means the operation of two (2) or more vehicles from a
point side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive attempt to out-
distance each other, or the operation of one (1) or more vehicles over a com-
mon selected course, from the same point to the same point, for the purpose
of comparing the relative speeds or power of acceleration of the vehicles
within a certain distance or time limit.
(15) "Driver" means every person who drives or is in actual physical
control of a vehicle.
(16) "Driver's license" means a license or permit, including an elec-
tronic driver's license as described in section 49-315A, Idaho Code, issued
by the department or by any other jurisdiction to an individual which autho-
rizes the individual to operate a motor vehicle or commercial motor vehicle
on the highways in accordance with the requirements of title 49, Idaho Code.
(17) "Driver's license -- Classes of" are issued for the operation of a
vehicle based on the size of the vehicle or the type of load and mean:
(a) Class A. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation
of any combination of motor vehicles with a manufacturer's gross combi-
nation weight rating (GCWR) in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000)
pounds, provided the manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR)
of the vehicle(s) being towed is in excess of ten thousand (10,000)
pounds. Persons holding a valid class A license may also operate vehi-
cles requiring a class B, C or D license.
(b) Class B. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation
of any single vehicle with a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rat-
ing (GVWR) in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, or any such
vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds
manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR). Persons holding a
valid class B license may also operate vehicles requiring a class C li-
cense or a class D license.
(c) Class C. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation
of any single vehicle or combination of vehicles that does not meet the
definition of class A or class B, as defined in this section, but that
either is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more people including
the driver, or is of any size which does not meet the definition of class
A or class B and is used in the transportation of materials found to be
hazardous according to the hazardous material transportation act and
which requires the motor vehicle to be placarded under the federal haz-
ardous materials regulations 49 CFR part 172, subpart F. Persons hold-
ing a valid class C license may also operate vehicles requiring a class D
license.
(d) Class D. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation of
a motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle as defined in section
49-123, Idaho Code.


(e) "Seasonal driver's license" means a special restricted class B or
C driver's license to operate certain commercial vehicles in farm-re-
lated industries under restrictions imposed by the department. As used
in this definition, "farm-related industry" shall mean custom har-
vesters, farm retail outlets and suppliers, agri-chemical businesses
and livestock feeders. Seasonal driver's licenses are not valid for
driving vehicles carrying any quantities of hazardous material requir-
ing placarding, except for diesel fuel in quantities of one thousand
(1,000) gallons or less, liquid fertilizers, i.e., plant nutrients,
in vehicles or implements of husbandry with total capacities of three
thousand (3,000) gallons or less, and solid fertilizers, i.e., solid
plant nutrients, that are not mixed with any organic substance.
(18) "Driver record" means any record that pertains to an individual's
driver's license, driving permit, driving privileges, driving history,
identification documents or other similar credentials issued by the depart-
ment.
(19) "Driver's license endorsements" means special authorizations that
are required to be displayed on a driver's license which permit the driver to
operate certain types of commercial vehicles or commercial vehicles hauling
certain types of cargo, or to operate a motorcycle or a school bus.
(a) "Endorsement T -- Double/Triple trailer" means this endorsement is
required on a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a
vehicle authorized to tow more than one (1) trailer.
(b) "Endorsement H -- Hazardous material" means this endorsement is re-
quired on a class A, B or C license if the driver is operating a vehicle
used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous according
to the hazardous material transportation act and which requires the mo-
tor vehicle to be placarded under the federal hazardous materials regu-
lations 49 CFR part 172, subpart F.
(c) "Endorsement P -- Passenger" means this endorsement is required on
a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a vehicle de-
signed to transport sixteen (16) or more people including the driver.
(d) "Endorsement N -- Tank vehicle" means this endorsement is required
on a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a tank ve-
hicle as defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code.
(e) "Endorsement M -- Motorcycle" means this endorsement is required on
a driver's license to permit the driver to operate a motorcycle or mo-
tor-driven cycle.
(f) "Endorsement S -- School bus" means this endorsement is required on
a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a school bus
in accordance with 49 CFR part 383, to transport preprimary, primary or
secondary school students from home to school, from school to home, or
to and from school-sponsored events. School bus does not include a bus
used as a common carrier.
(20) "Driveway" means a private road giving access from a public way to a
building on abutting grounds.
(21) "Dromedary tractor" means every motor vehicle designed and used
primarily for drawing a semitrailer and so constructed as to carry mani-
fested cargo in addition to a part of the weight of the semitrailer.


SECTION 2. That Section 49-315, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-315. LICENSES ISSUED TO DRIVERS. (1) The department shall issue
to every qualifying applicant a distinguishing driver's license as applied
for, which shall bear a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the
full name, date of birth, Idaho residence address, sex, weight, height, eye
color, hair color, color photograph, name of this state, date of issuance,
date of expiration, license class, endorsements, restrictions, and the ap-
plicant's signature. If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant's
driver's license shall contain his or her alternative Idaho mailing address
in place of his or her Idaho residence address. Driver's licenses for per-
sons under eighteen (18) years of age shall include a notation "under 18
until (month, day, year)," and driver's licenses for persons eighteen (18)
years of age to twenty-one (21) years of age shall include a notation "under
21 until (month, day, year)." No driver's license shall be valid until it has
been signed on the signature line of the license by the licensee. Driver's
licenses for persons who are United States citizens shall, where possible,
include the notation "USA." An electronic driver's license pursuant to sec-
tion 49-315A, Idaho Code, shall be designed to satisfy the requirements of
this subsection and shall be deemed to comply with such requirements.
(2) Every driver's license shall bear a color photograph of the li-
censee, which shall be taken by the examiner at the time the application is
made. The photograph shall be taken without headgear or other clothing or
device that disguises or otherwise conceals the face or head of the appli-
cant. A waiver may be granted by the department allowing the applicant to
wear headgear or other head covering for medical, religious or safety pur-
poses as long as the face is not disguised or otherwise concealed. At the
request of the applicant, a driver's license may contain a statement or indi-
cation of the medical condition of the licensee.
(3) The department shall notify the commercial driver license infor-
mation system that a class A, B or C driver's license has been issued as re-
quired by 49 CFR parts 383 and 384.
(4) A licensee applying for a hazardous material endorsement on a
driver's license shall have a security background records check and shall
receive clearance from the federal transportation security administration
before the endorsement can be issued, renewed or transferred as required
by 49 CFR part 383, subject to procedures established by the federal trans-
portation security administration.
(5) A licensee who desires to donate any or all organs or tissue in the
event of death, and who has completed a document of gift pursuant to the pro-
visions for donation of anatomical gifts as set forth in chapter 34, title
39, Idaho Code, may, at the option of the donor, indicate this desire on the
driver's license by the imprinting of the word "donor" on the license. The
provisions of this subsection shall apply to licensees fifteen (15) years of
age or older but less than eighteen (18) years of age if the requirements pro-
vided in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, have been complied with and the
donor indicates this desire be placed on the license.


(6) A licensee who is a person with a permanent disability may request
that the notation "permanently disabled" be imprinted on the driver's li-
cense, provided the licensee presents written certification from a licensed
physician verifying that the licensee's stated impairment qualifies as a
permanent disability according to the provisions of section 49-117, Idaho
Code.
(7) A licensee who is a veteran may request that his or her status as
such be designated on the driver's license at no additional cost. Any such
request shall be accompanied by proof of being a current or former member of
the United States armed forces. Upon request and submission of satisfactory
proof, the department shall indicate such person's status as a veteran on any
class of driver's license issued pursuant to this section. Such designation
shall be made upon original issuance or renewal of a driver's license. Des-
ignation shall also be made on any duplicate driver's license issued, pro-
vided that the fee for such duplicate driver's license is paid in accordance
with section 49-306, Idaho Code.
Satisfactory proof of being a current or former member of the United
States armed forces must be furnished by an applicant to the department
before a designation of veteran status will be indicated on any class of
driver's license. Acceptable proof shall be a copy of form DD214 or an equiv-
alent document or statement from the department of veterans affairs that
identifies a character of service upon separation as "honorable" or "general
under honorable conditions."
SECTION 3. That Chapter 3, Title 49, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 49-315A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
49-315A. ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSES. (1) On or before July 1, 2026,
the department shall establish and maintain a process and system for an in-
dividual to obtain an electronic driver's license in addition to a physical
driver's license.
(2) An electronic driver's license, as provided for in this section,
shall be an electronic extension of a department-issued physical credential
that conveys identity and driving privilege information and is in compliance
with the American association of motor vehicle administrators' (AAMVA) mo-
bile driver license implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 stan-
dard. It shall be capable of being displayed on a wireless communication
device and shall be deemed a valid driver's license for all purposes under
Idaho Code.
(3) The department shall ensure that the system and technology used for
an electronic license certificate or identification card maintains the data
security and privacy of the individual.
(4) A person or entity that seeks to view an individual's electronic
driver's license for identity or age verification purposes shall access only
the identity elements necessary for the transaction or purpose prompting
the request through an authenticator that validates these elements against
AAMVA's digital trust service.
(5) The department is authorized to promulgate rules, subject to leg-
islative approval, to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. That Section 49-316, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-316. DRIVER'S LICENSE TO BE CARRIED AND EXHIBITED ON DEMAND. (1)
Every licensee shall have his physical driver's license in his immediate
possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall, upon de-
mand, surrender the driver's license into the hands of a peace officer for
his inspection. However, no person charged with a violation of the provi-
sions of this section shall be convicted if a driver's license issued to the
person and valid at the time of his arrest is produced in court.
(2) If a licensee has his electronic driver's license inspected by a
peace officer, the licensee shall not be deemed to have consented to the
peace officer viewing or accessing any other content on the licensee's wire-
less communication device. A licensee displaying an electronic driver's
license to a peace officer may keep the device in his possession and shall not
be required to surrender the device.
SECTION 5. That Section 49-322, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-322. AUTHORITY OF DEPARTMENT TO CANCEL AND DOWNGRADE DRIVER'S LI-
CENSE OR INSTRUCTION PERMIT. (1) The department shall cancel any driver's
license, restricted school attendance driving permit, or instruction permit
upon determining that the licensee or permittee was not entitled to the is-
suance of the driver's license or instruction permit, that the licensee or
permittee failed to give the required or correct information in his applica-
tion, or that the licensee or permittee committed fraud in making the appli-
cation.
(2) Upon a cancellation, the licensee or permittee shall surrender the
canceled driver's license or canceled instruction permit to the department,
and the department shall cancel the licensee's electronic driver's license,
if applicable. The licensee shall not be required to surrender a device on
which an electronic driver's license is held.
(3) The department shall cancel a person's commercial driver's license
upon determining that the class A, B or C licensee has falsified information.
Upon cancellation of a class A, B or C driver's license, the licensee shall be
disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty
(60) days.
(4) The department shall decertify the medical status and initiate a
downgrade of any driver who is required by the federal motor carrier safety
administration to maintain a medical examiner's certificate and/or medical
exemption letter or skill performance evaluation certificate upon determin-
ing the person's medical certification has expired or has been revoked or
canceled. The department shall change the person's driving status in the
driver record to "not-certified," within ten (10) days and shall mail a no-
tification letter regarding the pending decertification and downgrade ac-
tion to the driver's last known address. The downgrade action shall occur no
more than sixty (60) days from the date the not-certified status is posted to
the record. Drivers can remove the not-certified medical status from their
driving record by presenting a current and valid medical examiner's certifi-
cate and/or medical exemption letter or skill performance evaluation cer-


tificate to the department or by submitting an application to the department
requesting their medical status be changed to "excepted."
(5) The department shall remove and, when applicable, subsequently re-
instate a driver's commercial driving privileges upon receiving notifica-
tion of a driver's status change in the drug and alcohol clearinghouse.
(6) When a driver's license has been canceled for reasons of impair-
ment, incompetence or inability of the licensed driver to operate a motor
vehicle safely as provided in section 49-303 or 49-326, Idaho Code, and
the licensee has voluntarily surrendered his driver's license, or when a
licensed driver requests cancellation of his license for any of the same
reasons stated in this subsection and he voluntarily surrenders his license,
the licensee may be eligible for a no-fee identification card as provided in
section 49-2444, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 49-2444, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-2444. IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED -- FOUR-YEAR OR EIGHT-YEAR. (1)
The department shall issue a distinguishing identification card that sets
forth the information contained in the application in a form as prescribed
by the department. All identification cards issued on or after January 1,
1993, shall not contain the applicant's social security number. An appli-
cant's social security number shall be exempt from disclosure except for in-
quiries from agencies or institutions authorized to obtain such information
by federal law or regulation, from peace officers, or from jury commission-
ers. Each card shall have printed on it the applicant's full name, date of
birth, Idaho residence address, sex, weight, height, eye color, and hair
color and shall include a distinguishing number assigned to the applicant.
If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant's identification card
shall contain his or her alternative Idaho mailing address in place of his or
her Idaho residence address. Each card shall also have printed on it the name
of this state, the date of issuance, and the date of expiration. An identi-
fication card shall not be valid until it has been signed on the signature
line by the applicant. Each card shall include a color photograph of the ap-
plicant, which shall be taken by the examiner at the time of application.
The photograph shall be taken without headgear or other clothing or device
that disguises or otherwise conceals the face or head of the applicant. A
waiver may be granted by the department allowing the applicant to wear head-
gear or other head covering for medical, religious or safety purposes as long
as the face is not disguised or otherwise concealed. At the request of the
applicant, an identification card may contain a statement or indication of
the medical condition of the applicant. An electronic identification card
pursuant to section 49-2444A, Idaho Code, shall be designed to satisfy the
requirements of this subsection and shall be deemed to comply with such re-
quirements.
(2) No person shall receive an identification card unless and until he
surrenders to the department all identification cards in his possession is-
sued to him by Idaho or any other jurisdiction, or any driver's license is-
sued by any other jurisdiction within the United States, or until he executes


an affidavit that he does not possess an identification card or any driver's
license.
(3) Identification cards issued to persons under eighteen (18) years of
age shall include a notation "under 18 until (month, day, year)," and iden-
tification cards issued to persons eighteen (18) years of age to twenty-one
(21) years of age shall include a notation "under 21 until (month, day,
year)." The nonrefundable fee for a four (4) year identification card issued
to persons twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall be fifteen dollars
($15.00), of which ten dollars ($10.00) shall be retained by the county
and credited to the current expense fund and five dollars ($5.00) shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the highway distribution
account. The nonrefundable fee for identification cards issued to persons
under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be ten dollars ($10.00), of which
five dollars ($5.00) shall be retained by the authorized issuing agent or,
if issued by the county, shall be credited to the current expense fund and
five dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit
of the highway distribution account. The nonrefundable fee for an eight (8)
year identification card shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00), of which
fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be retained by the authorized issuing agent
or, if issued by the county, shall be credited to the current expense fund and
ten dollars ($10.00) shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit
of the highway distribution account. At the option of the applicant, the
identification card issued to a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older
shall expire either on the card holder's birthday in the fourth year or the
eighth year following issuance of the card, except as otherwise provided
in subsection (7) of this section. Every identification card issued to a
person under eighteen (18) years of age shall expire five (5) days after the
person's eighteenth birthday, except as otherwise provided in subsection
(7) of this section. Every identification card issued to a person eighteen
(18) years of age but under twenty-one (21) years of age shall expire five (5)
days after the person's twenty-first birthday, except as otherwise provided
in subsection (7) of this section.
(4) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3
of the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. 451 et seq., as
amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registration re-
quirements in conjunction with an application for an identification card.
Any registration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the depart-
ment to the selective service system.
(5) Every identification card, except those issued to persons under
twenty-one (21) years of age, shall be renewable on or before its expiration,
but not more than twenty-five (25) months before, and upon application and
payment of the required fee.
(6) The applicant for an identification card must submit proof of iden-
tity and citizenship status acceptable to the examiner or the department and
date of birth as set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate. When
a certified copy of his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate is
impossible to obtain from a vital statistics agency, another government-is-
sued document may be submitted that provides satisfactory evidence of a per-
son's full legal name and date of birth acceptable to the examiner or the de-
partment.


(7) Every identification card issued to a person who is a citizen of the
United States shall, where possible, include the notation "USA." Every iden-
tification card issued to a person who is not a citizen or permanent legal
resident of the United States shall have an expiration date that is the same
date as the end of lawful stay in the United States as indicated on documents
issued and verified by the department of homeland security; however, the ex-
piration date shall not extend beyond the expiration date for the same cate-
gory of identification card issued to citizens. Persons whose department of
homeland security documents do not state an expiration date shall be issued
an identification card with an expiration date of one (1) year from the date
of issuance.
(8) When an identification card has been expired for less than twenty-
five (25) months, the renewal of the identification card shall start from
the original date of expiration, regardless of the year in which the applica-
tion for renewal is made. If the identification card is expired for more than
twenty-five (25) months, the application shall expire, at the option of the
applicant, on the applicant's birthday in the fourth year or the eighth year
following reissuance of the identification card, except as otherwise pro-
vided in subsection (7) of this section.
(9)(a) If an Idaho identification card has expired or will expire and
the identification card holder is temporarily out of state, except
on active military duty, the identification card holder may request
in writing on a form prescribed by the department an extension of the
identification card. The request shall be accompanied by the fee
fixed in section 49-306, Idaho Code, and the extension shall be no more
than a twelve (12) month period. If the department determines that an
extension of the identification card is necessary, it may issue an iden-
tification card showing the date to which the expired identification
card is extended. Identification card extensions are limited to two (2)
consecutive extensions per identification card holder.
(b) Upon returning to the state of Idaho, the identification card
holder shall, within ten (10) days, apply for a renewal of the expired
identification card and surrender the extended identification card and
the expired identification card.
(10) An Idaho identification card issued to any person prior to serving
on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, or a member of the
immediate family accompanying such a person, if valid and in full force and
effect upon entering active duty, shall remain in full force and effect and
shall, upon application, be extended for a period of four (4) years as long
as active duty continues, and the identification card shall remain in full
force and effect sixty (60) days following the date the card holder is re-
leased from active duty.
(11) A person possessing an identification card who desires to donate
any or all organs or tissue in the event of death, and who has completed a
document of gift pursuant to the provisions for donation of anatomical gifts
as set forth in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, may, at the option of the
donor, indicate this desire on the identification card by the imprinting of
the word "donor" on the identification card. The provisions of this subsec-
tion shall apply to persons possessing an identification card who are fif-
teen (15) years of age or older but less than eighteen (18) years of age if


the requirements provided in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, have been com-
plied with.
(12) A person possessing an identification card or an applicant for an
identification card who is a person with a permanent disability may request
that the notation "permanently disabled" be imprinted on the identification
card, provided the person presents written certification from a licensed
physician verifying that the person's stated impairment qualifies as a per-
manent disability according to the provisions of section 49-117, Idaho Code.
(13) A person who is a veteran may request that his or her status as such
be designated on an identification card at no additional cost. Any such re-
quest shall be accompanied by proof of being a current or former member of
the United States armed forces. Upon request and submission of satisfactory
proof, the department shall indicate such person's status as a veteran on any
identification card issued pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such
designation shall be made upon original issuance or renewal of an identifi-
cation card. Designation shall also be made on any duplicate identification
card issued, provided that the fee for such duplicate card is paid in accor-
dance with this section.
(14) Satisfactory proof of being a current or former member of the
United States armed forces must be furnished by an applicant to the de-
partment before a designation of veteran status will be indicated on any
identification card. Acceptable proof shall be a copy of form DD214 or an
equivalent document or statement from the department of veterans affairs
that identifies a character of service upon separation as "honorable" or
"general under honorable conditions."
(15) In the case of a name change, the applicant shall provide legal doc-
umentation to verify the change in accordance with department rules.
(16) Whenever any person, after applying for or receiving an identifi-
cation card, moves from the address shown on the application or on the iden-
tification card issued, that person shall, within thirty (30) days, notify
the transportation department in writing of the old and new addresses.
(17) The department shall cancel any identification card upon determin-
ing that the person was not entitled to the issuance of the identification
card or that the person failed to give the required and correct information
in his application or committed fraud in making the application. Upon can-
cellation, the person shall surrender the canceled identification card to
the department.
(18) If any person shall fail to return to the department the identifi-
cation card as required, the department may direct any peace officer to se-
cure its possession and return the identification card to the department.
(19) The department may issue a no-fee identification card to an indi-
vidual whose driver's license has been canceled and voluntarily surrendered
as provided in section 49-322(5), Idaho Code. The identification card may be
renewed at no cost to the applicant as long as the driver's license remains
canceled.
(20) It is an infraction for any person to fail to notify the department
of a change of address as required by the provisions of subsection (16) of
this section.
(21) The department may issue an initial four (4) year no-fee identifi-
cation card to an individual who is homeless. The department shall establish


a form for verification of homelessness pursuant to this section. Such form
shall require the signature of an outreach worker or service worker verify-
ing that the individual is homeless and attesting to the individual's resi-
dency at an Idaho relief agency or shelter. An applicant issued an identifi-
cation card under the provisions of this subsection shall be entitled to one
(1) free replacement. Subsequent replacements and renewals of this identi-
fication card will be subject to the fees imposed in this section.
(22) The department shall issue a four (4) year no-fee identification
card to any individual eighteen (18) years of age or older who indicates on
the application that an identification card is needed to comply with voter
registration or voting requirements. An applicant issued an identification
card under this subsection shall be entitled to one (1) free replacement.
Such applicants are entitled to no-fee renewals as long as the applicant
meets the requirements of this subsection at the time of renewal.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 24, Title 49, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 49-2444A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
49-2444A. ELECTRONIC IDENTIFICATION CARDS. (1) On or before July 1,
2026, the department shall establish and maintain a process and system for
an individual to obtain an electronic identification card in addition to a
physical identification card.
(2) An electronic identification card, as provided for in this section,
shall be an electronic extension of the department-issued physical creden-
tial that conveys identity information and is in compliance with the AAMVA
mobile driver license implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5
standard. It shall be capable of being displayed on a wireless communication
device and shall be deemed a valid identification card for all purposes under
Idaho Code.
(3) The department shall ensure that the system and technology used for
an electronic identification card maintains the data security and privacy of
the individual.
(4) A person or entity that seeks to view an individual's electronic
identification card for identity or age verification purposes shall access
only the identity elements necessary for the transaction or purpose prompt-
ing the request through an authenticator that validates these elements
against AAMVA's digital trust service.
(5) The department is authorized to promulgate rules, subject to leg-
islative approval, to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 8. That Section 34-1113, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1113. IDENTIFICATION AT THE POLLS. All voters shall be required
to provide personal identification before voting at the polls or at absent
electors polling places as required by section 34-1006, Idaho Code. The per-
sonal identification that may be presented shall be one (1) of the following:
(1) An Idaho driver's license or identification card issued by the
Idaho transportation department, except that such driver's license shall
not include an electronic driver's license or identification card issued


by the Idaho transportation department pursuant to section 49-315A or
49-2444A, Idaho Code;
(2) A passport or an identification card, including a photograph, is-
sued by an agency of the United States government;
(3) A tribal identification card, including a photograph; or
(4) A license to carry concealed weapons issued under section 18-3302,
Idaho Code, or an enhanced license to carry concealed weapons issued under
section 18-3302K, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 3 and 7 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after July 1, 2025. Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, and 8 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.